Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.24.030

Compliance with fiduciary activities standards equivalent to that of national banks—Statement of principles of trust management—Management of third-party risk.

(1) Unless the director shall otherwise set forth by rule, a state trust company and, to the extent applicable, its affiliates, and their respective directors, officers, managers, employees, and agents, shall comply with such federal regulations applicable to the fiduciary activities of a federally insured state bank.

(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section, as applicable to a state trust company, shall be at least partially contained in the state trust company's written statement of principles of trust management, the contents of which shall be subject to examination and approval by the department, and upon which the department may further examine a state trust company as to whether it is in compliance with such statement.

(3) A state trust company and, to the extent applicable, its affiliate, shall comply with standards for prudent management of third-party risk under applicable law or as the director may otherwise adopt by rule or by a written interpretive statement including, without limitation, management of third-party risk pursuant to RCW 30B.24.060.

[ 2019 c 389 s 42.]